Massachusetts, session 194th, H1526.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be a special commission established to study the feasibility,
impact and design of a rent stabilization law for the commonwealth. The commission shall
consist of 11 members representing a diverse range of perspectives, including tenant advocacy
groups, landlords, housing policy experts and municipal government officials. The members
shall include: (i) the secretary of the executive office of housing and livable communities or the
secretary's designee, who shall serve as chair; (ii) 2 members appointed by the governor; (iii) 2
members from a housing nonprofit located in the commonwealth; (iv) 1 member from a public
housing development organization; (v) 1 member from a private housing development
organization; (vi) 3 members from communities in the commonwealth affected by rent
stabilization; and (vii) 1 member with a background in real estate.
(b) The study shall include, but not be limited to:
of 2

(i) assessments on the impact of rent increases on housing affordability across the
commonwealth, including focusing on high-demand areas such as Boston, Lowell and
Cambridge and other gateway cities;
(ii) evaluations on existing rent stabilization models in other states and municipalities,
including their successes, challenges and applicability to the commonwealth; and
(iii) analysis on the economic implications of rent stabilization for tenants, landlords and
the broader housing market in the commonwealth; and
(iv) comprehensive data gathered on rental trends, vacancy rates, tenant displacement and
housing supply to inform policy recommendations.
(c) The commission shall hold public hearings on rent stabilization to ensure community
voices are reflected and incorporated into the study.
(d) The department shall prepare a report on its activities and on any findings and
recommendations. The report shall be submitted to the: (i) governor; (ii) chairs of the joint
committee on the housing; (iii) chairs of the senate and house committees on ways and means;
and (iv) offices of the house and senate clerk not later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 90 days after its passage.
of 2